Arkansas, session 2025, HB1323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. The purpose of this act is to limit the investment of
Arkansas's pension and retirement system funds in entities closely connected
with the People's Republic of China and its governing Communist Party of
China.








*LGL055*
01/30/2025 11:37:44 AM LGL055